Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities § 1 et seq.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities § 5 to 31.

§ 21-17-101.
Establishment.

There is established in this state, at the city of Laramie, an institution of learning to be known as “The University of Wyoming”.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 485; C.S. 1910, § 410; C.S. 1920, § 465; R.S. 1931, § 108-501; C.S. 1945, § 70-101; W.S. 1957, § 21-335; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-101

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1886, ch. 37, §§ 1 through 55, provided for the selection of sites, bonds for funds and the erection of the state capitol building and the state university. This act also provided for the operation and government of the university. Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, contained a preamble which provided as follows: “That so much of chapter one of title forty-two of the Revised Statutes of Wyoming, as relates to the establishment, government and maintenance of the University of Wyoming is hereby amended so as to read as follows.” Then followed 15 sections of legislation which did not specify any particular existing laws, or specific sections of existing laws, which were amended.

Sale of university buildings and improvements. —

Laws 1990, ch. 91, § 2, provides: “Upon execution of instruments satisfactory to the attorney general conveying to the state interests of the University of Wyoming in any buildings or improvements appurtenant to lands described under W.S. 36-8-1001(a), the purchasing and property control division of the department of administration and fiscal control shall conduct a public sale of remaining buildings or improvements with any proceeds less costs of sale, accruing to the University of Wyoming for use in the acquisition of necessary equipment for the university animal science livestock center.”

Suit against university to quiet title held suit against state. —

Suit against the trustees of university to quiet title to land forming part of land granted to state for benefit of a university by act of admission was a “suit against the state,” and not maintainable without the consent of the state under art. 1, § 8, Wyo. Const., the state being holder of the legal title to the land, and the trustees being public agents of the state. Hjorth Royalty Co. v. University of Wyoming, 30 Wyo. 309, 222 P. 9,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 21-17-102.
Objects; departments.

The objects of the university are to provide an efficient means of imparting to men and women, without regard to color, on equal terms, a liberal education, together with a thorough knowledge of the various branches connected with the scientific, industrial and professional pursuits. To this end it shall embrace colleges or departments of letters, of science and of the arts together with such professional or other departments as in course of time may be connected therewith. The department of letters shall embrace a liberal course of instruction in language, literature and philosophy, together with such courses or parts of courses in the college or department of science as are deemed necessary.

The college, or department of science, shall embrace courses of instruction in the mathematical, physical and natural sciences, together with such courses in language, literature and philosophy as shall constitute a liberal education. The college or department of the arts shall embrace courses of instruction in the practical and fine arts and especially in the applications of science to the arts of mining and metallurgy, mechanics, engineering, architecture, agriculture and commerce, together with instruction in military tactics, and in such branches in the department of letters, as are necessary to a proper fitness of students for their chosen pursuits, and as soon as the income of the university will allow, in such order as the wants of the public shall seem to require, the courses in the sciences and their practical applications shall be expanded into full and distinct schools or departments.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 486, 487; C.S. 1910, §§ 411, 412; C.S. 1920, §§ 466, 467; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-502, 108-503; C.S. 1945, §§ 70-102, 70-103; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-335, 21-336; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-102

.

University Energy Institute. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 337, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, directs the University of Wyoming to develop an academic and financial plan for the development and operation of a proposed energy institute, which plan is to include: (1) the mission of the institute, its goals, objective and structure; (2) a summary of the personnel needed to achieve the goals and objectives; (3) an analysis of the funding necessary to sustain a meaningful, long term presence in research and scholarship related to energy and natural resources; (4) identification of financial resources that may be sought for continuing support of the institute; (5) a time schedule for rasing matching funds for implementation of the institute and plan; (6) the means by which the leadership of the institute will be recruited; (7) a statement of the laboratory and other facility needs for the institute and their estimated cost; and (8) in its development extensive consultation with leaders of Wyoming's renewable and nonrenewable energy industry. The act appropriates $5,000 from the budget reserve account to the university to pay per diem and travel expenses for business leaders participating in the development of the plan at the request of the university. The plan is to be submitted by October 1, 2005, to the governor and a legislative committee designated to receive it by the legislature's management council.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Executive training center. —

Laws 2005, ch. 198, §§ 1 through 3, appropriates $945,000 to a steering committee, under a joint legislative/executive oversight committee, to conduct a feasibility study for an executive training, conference and institutes center. Specifically, the committee is to: (1) develop a plan for the content of the executive training program, which includes the mission, academic program, financial plan and executive campus design with state of the art technology; (2) identify and pursue opportunities to establish relationships with other nationally recognized business schools for the operation of the executive training, conference and institutes center; (3) develop a business plan for determining the appropriate executive training tuition levels, with the ability to offer reduced tuition to Wyoming business professionals; (4) develop criteria, costs and options, including evaluation of existing facilities, for an appropriate site of the executive training center and the premier graduate school of business, to be developed with consultation with the board of county commissioners of Teton County, the council of the city of Jackson and public input from Teton County; (5) determine the need for building and other facilities, including faculty and student housing, to implement the plans for the center and graduate school; (6) develop a preliminary plan for the content of the graduate school educational program, which may include areas of concentration in environment and natural resources and entrepreneurship as components of business development and management strategies; (7) develop a preliminary graduate school tuition plan for determining appropriate tuition levels, with the ability to provide slots for University of Wyoming graduates at a reduced tuition rate; (8) develop a proposed budget for implementing its recommendations and identify funding sources; and (9) after developing the plans and budget specified, hold not less than five public hearings at regionally dispersed locations throughout the state, to receive public comments and recommendations with respect to those plans and the proposed budget. The steering committee is to report its plan for the executive training, conference and institutes center and its plans for the graduate school of business to the joint oversight committee no later than October 1, 2005. If recommended by the steering committee, the oversight and steering committees is to evaluate and recommend an appropriate site in Teton County, Wyoming, suitable to construct and operate an executive training, conference and institutes center in preparation for the establishment of a premier graduate school of business. The joint committee is to submit the plan together with any recommendations for additional legislation necessary to implement the plan, including building, facilities and staffing needs, to the legislature not later than December 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 198, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Land grant fund. —

An institution, although established by the state for agricultural education, cannot compel payment of any part of interest on the land grant fund to it, disposition of which is wholly within power of the state acting through its legislature. Wyoming ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

§ 21-17-103.
Powers and duties of the faculty.

The president and professors of the university shall be styled “the faculty”, and may enforce rules and regulations adopted by the trustees for the government of students, reward and censure students as they may deserve, and generally exercise such discipline, in harmony with the regulations, as is necessary for the good order of the institution. The faculty may present to the trustees for degrees and honors such students as are entitled thereto, and in testimony thereof, when ordered by the board, suitable diplomas, certificates or other testimonials under the seal of the university, and the signatures of the faculty. When, in course of time, distinct colleges or departments of the university are duly organized and in active operation, the immediate government of such departments shall, in like manner, be entrusted to their respective faculties.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 493; C.S. 1910, § 418; C.S. 1920, § 473; R.S. 1931, § 108-509; C.S. 1945, § 70-109; W.S. 1957, § 21-338; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-103

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Colleges and Universities: The Demise of In Loco Parentis,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 715 (1971).

§ 21-17-104.
Powers and duties of the president.

The president of the university shall be president of the several faculties and the executive head of all the departments. As such, subject to the board of trustees, he has authority to give general direction to the instruction and investigations of the several schools and departments, and, so long as the interests of the institution require it, he may be charged with the duties of one (1) of the professorships.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 494; C.S. 1910, § 419; C.S. 1920, § 474; R.S. 1931, § 108-510; C.S. 1945, § 70-110; W.S. 1957, § 21-339; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-104

.

Cross references. —

As to president's serving as member of board of trustees of university, see §

21-17-201

.

As to university president's serving as member of geological survey board, see §

9-2-807

.

§ 21-17-105.
Tuition to be as nearly free as possible; number, qualifications and selection of students for reduced tuition; tuition for veterans, their spouses and children; reciprocal residency.

To the end that none of the youth of the state who crave the benefits of higher education may be denied, and that all may be encouraged to avail themselves of the advantages offered by the university or community colleges, tuition shall be as nearly free as possible, and it shall be reduced by five hundred dollars ($500.00) per semester to either the university or any community college in the state, as elected by the student, to three (3) students annually from each county as are selected and appointed by the board of county commissioners therein. Scholarships under this section shall be in addition to any Hathaway scholarship awarded a student under W.S.

21-16-1301

et seq., but shall be considered for purposes of calculating unmet financial need for Hathaway need based scholarships.

Students shall be appointed after due consideration of the individual student’s extra curricular activity, scholastic ability and American college testing score. Grade point average and American college testing scores shall be equally weighted. For any entering student who fails a math or English placement test, the reduced tuition scholarship under this section is not effective. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the county commissioners may award one (1) additional scholarship each year as a renewal to a student maintaining above a 2.50 average, provided that the total number of students receiving original and renewal scholarships in any county in any year shall not exceed:

Counties of the first class, four (4) students;

Counties of the second class, three (3) students; and

Counties of the third class, two (2) students.

Any honor scholarships granted by the University of Wyoming shall be based on the student’s scholastic ability and American college testing scores. Grade point average and American college testing scores shall be equally weighted. For any entering student who fails a math or English placement test, the scholarship is not effective.

Any person including the spouse and any child of that person shall qualify as a resident for purposes of tuition at the university if:

His principal employment is located within Wyoming and the income from his employment is the principal source of income for his family;

He pays Wyoming taxes as required by law;

He has been employed within Wyoming for at least a majority of the twelve (12) consecutive months immediately preceding application for resident tuition pursuant to this subsection;

He resides in a state with a law substantially similar to this subsection; and

At the time of enrollment and in accordance with requirements of the enrolling institution, the person, his spouse or any child of that person submits to the university or community college a notarized affidavit attesting to the requirements of this subsection.

An applicant for resident tuition who is a veteran, eligible individual or covered individual as described in 38 U.S.C. 3679(c)(2), shall qualify as a resident for purposes of tuition at the University of Wyoming or Wyoming community college if the applicant provides:

A certificate or other evidence of the veteran’s or uniformed service member’s qualifying service in the uniformed services of the United States;

Documented evidence before or at the time of enrollment that:

The applicant for resident tuition intends to live in Wyoming during the term of enrollment;

The veteran was discharged or released from a qualifying period of service in the active military, naval or air service before the date of enrollment or the uniformed service member is currently on active duty;

The applicant is a veteran, eligible individual or covered individual as described in 38 U.S.C. 3679(c)(2).

For purposes of subsection (e) of this section, “uniformed services of the United States” means service in the United States army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, United States public health service commissioned corps, national oceanic and atmospheric administration commissioned corps, national guard or any reserve or auxiliary component thereof.

A person who has qualified for resident tuition under subsection (e) of this section shall remain qualified in subsequent years if the person pursues one (1) or more courses of education while remaining continuously enrolled, other than during regularly scheduled breaks, lives in the state during the term of enrollment and, if the person is eligible through a transfer of eligibility pursuant to 38 U.S.C. 3319, the transfer has not been validly revoked. A spouse or child of a uniformed service member who is eligible for resident tuition under subsection (e) of this section at the time of admittance to the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college shall not lose eligibility for resident tuition before the time of enrollment at the university or college because the uniformed service member is transferred on military orders outside of this state.

Trustees shall through regulation provide that students receiving a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship in any amount shall qualify for resident tuition at the university each semester the student receives the scholarship.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 497; C.S. 1910, § 422; C.S. 1920, § 477; R.S. 1931, § 108-513; Laws 1941, ch. 74, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 70-111; W.S. 1957, § 21-340; Laws 1977, ch. 60, § 1; ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-105

; Laws 1985, ch. 201, § 1; 1989, ch. 141, § 1; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; 2006, ch. 36, § 2; 2014 ch. 39, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; 2015 ch. 147, § 1, effective March 5, 2015; 2018 ch. 20, § 1, effective March 9, 2018; 2019 ch. 81, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), substituted “reduced by five hundred dollars ($500.00) per semester” for “wholly free,” and added the last sentence; substituted “reduced tuition scholarship under this section” for “scholarship” in (b).

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2014 amendment

added (e) through (g).

Laws 2014, ch. 39, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the introductory language of (e), which formerly read: “Effective for the 2014 summer school session and each semester thereafter, any person who is a military veteran who does not qualify as a resident pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall qualify as a resident for purposes of tuition at the University of Wyoming or Wyoming community college if the person provides”; in the introductory language of
(e)(i), substituted “the veteran's qualifying service in” for “honorable discharge from”; rewrote (e)(ii), which formerly read: “Documented evidence that the veteran has taken steps to establish residency in Wyoming”; rewrote (g), which formerly read: “Once a military veteran has qualified for resident tuition under subsection (e) of this section, the veteran shall remain qualified in subsequent years upon complying with paragraph (e)(ii) of this section”; and made stylistic and related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 147, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2015.

The 2018 amendment,

in (e), inserted “or covered individual”; in (e)(i), inserted “or uniformed service member’s”; in (e)(ii)(B), added “or the uniformed service member is currently on active duty”; rewrote (e)(ii)(C), which read: “If the applicant is a spouse or child of the veteran, transferee pursuant to 38 U.S.C. 3311(b)(9) or 3319 of the veteran's eligibility for educational benefits”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 20, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (h).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (e) deleted “Effective for the 2015 summer school session and each semester thereafter” at the beginning; in the introductory language of (e)(ii), added “before or” following “evidence”; and in (g) added “(1)” following “pursues one” and the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 6, states: “The scholarships provided under this act shall begin for students graduating from an eligible high school or a home-based educational program or receiving a GED after April 1, 2006 and shall be provided beginning with the fall semester 2006.”

W.S. 21-17-105(e)(i) as amended by 2015 Wyoming Session Laws, ch. 147, § 1 deleted subparagraphs (A) and (B).
This section is set forth as directed by the Legislative Service Office.

Cross references. —

As to instruction at university being as free as possible, see art. 7, § 16, Wyo. Const.

As to an educational assistance plan for national guard members, see §

19-9-501

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Absence from or inability to attend school or college as affecting liability for or right to recover payments for tuition or board, 20 ALR4th 303.

§ 21-17-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 12, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 11, related to countersigned diplomas as teachers' certificates of qualification.

§ 21-17-107.
Legislature to make appropriations.

The legislature shall appropriate monies intended for the support and maintenance of the University of Wyoming. The appropriations shall specify the purposes for which the monies are intended and may be used. The appropriations shall apply to and include all monies received by the university from the United States for the endowment and support of colleges for the benefit of agriculture and mechanic arts. No expenditure shall be made in excess of an appropriation, and no monies so appropriated shall be used for any purpose other than that for which they are appropriated.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 110, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 501; C.S. 1910, § 426; C.S. 1920, § 481; R.S. 1931, § 108-517; C.S. 1945, § 70-117; W.S. 1957, § 21-342; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-107.

Cross references. —

As to University of Wyoming endowment fund, see article 9 of chapter 16 of this title.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 2, subsection 67, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates $60,000 as one-time funding for continuing the University of Wyoming/Wyoming Heritage Foundation Leadership Wyoming Program for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006, and $2,984,000 for the department of intercollegiate athletics to enhance future revenue generation, restore competitive excellence and achieve academic success. These funds are to be considered one-time funds, shall not revert and shall not be included in the university's standard budget for the fiscal 2007-2008 biennium.

§ 21-17-108.
Agreements with boards or trustees of community colleges, school districts or university centers, collaboration with community colleges.

The University of Wyoming may enter into agreements with the several community college district boards or the boards of trustees of school districts providing for the joint operation of the institutions in whole or in part or for the furnishing of services, facilities and staff members of the University of Wyoming to the institution. Agreements may provide for the granting of University of Wyoming credit for collegiate work done in the institution.

The University of Wyoming in collaboration with the community colleges, shall establish an accrediting committee which shall determine the credit to be granted by the University of Wyoming for work taken in community colleges or university centers. In addition, the university shall cooperate with the Wyoming community college commission in developing and maintaining a common course numbering system among community colleges and the university pursuant to W.S. 21-18-202(b)(ii).

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 146, §§ 8, 9; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-343, 21-344; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-108; Laws 1991, ch. 228, § 11; 2000, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 21-17-109.
Course in field of professional health services; authority to offer; contracts with students; repayment of funds expended; deposit of repayments.

In addition to other powers heretofore granted to the trustees of the University of Wyoming, the board may offer and provide, in whole or in part at the university or in whole or in part at other institutions, universities or colleges within or without the state, a course of training and education in the field of professional health services including and limited to medicine, dentistry, veterinary, optometry or nursing.

To accomplish the purposes hereof and in order that degrees in such fields of professional health services may be awarded by the university the board of trustees may enter into contracts with other institutions, universities or colleges within or without the state that maintain schools for the training and education of students in professional health services and to expend its funds in connection therewith.

Students desiring to avail themselves of the opportunities under this section, before enrolling for such courses and having passed a competitive examination, must be approved by the president of the university acting with the advice of the respective state board in each particular field. No student shall be approved by the president unless the student or the student’s father, mother or lawful guardian are residents of Wyoming and have been residents for not less than five (5) years immediately prior thereto.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, before expending any funds the board of trustees shall obtain an agreement from each student whereby the student agrees to:

Authorize the state of Wyoming to pay all or a portion of the cost of attendance incurred in his or her medical education as determined by any contract between the state of Wyoming and the school of medicine providing that education; and

Actively engage in professional practice or other professional pursuits in Wyoming for not to exceed three (3) years as the board requires. The taking of a family practice residency program in the state shall be credited toward the practice requirements at the rate of one-third (1/3) year of practice for each year of service in a family practice residency program in the state; or

Repay all amounts expended by the state of Wyoming under paragraph (i) of this subsection on the student’s education, together with interest which shall begin accruing after the student’s residency but in no event later than eight (8) years after the student enters into an agreement, upon terms specified by the board. However, interest shall begin to accrue if the board finds that the student has withdrawn from medical school or a residency program or is otherwise not making satisfactory progress toward completion of the degree or program. Money expended under this subsection shall accrue at an annual interest rate equal to that charged for federal Stafford loans at the time interest begins to accrue, which rate shall be adjusted annually to match the federal Stafford loan rate. In no event shall the interest rate be greater than eight percent (8%);

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 176, § 2.

Any amounts, other than fees and tuition payments, paid by medical students in accordance with the contractual arrangements authorized under this section shall be deposited into a special fund designated the Medical School Student Fund, maintained and separately accounted for by the University of Wyoming, which fund may be added to by specific contributions from other sources. The fund may be invested, at the discretion of the president of the University of Wyoming and the dean of the College of Health Sciences, for the production of income. The investment income shall be expended by the University of Wyoming solely for direct assistance for relocation costs associated with practice in Wyoming, fees and materials for medical board examinations, rural training, dislocation, student development and scholarships to medical students as authorized by the president of the University of Wyoming and the dean of the College of Health Sciences. The principal of the fund established shall remain unimpaired and only the income derived therefrom may be collected and expended from year to year. The amount of income expended annually pursuant to this section shall not exceed an amount equal to four percent (4%) of the previous five (5) year average market value of the fund, calculated from the first day of the fiscal year. Any unexpended income shall remain in the fund. On or before October 1 of each year, the university shall submit a report to the joint appropriations committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee on income to the fund and expenditures from fund earnings during the prior fiscal year.

Upon recommendation of the president of the university, the board of trustees may relieve a student of the obligation to repay amounts expended under paragraph (d)(i) of this section, in whole or in part, where repayment would cause undue hardship. The university shall annually report the number of students relieved from repayment under this subsection to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than October 1.

Tuition and fees received by the University of Wyoming from students participating in the medical education program under this section, shall be separately accounted for by the university. These funds are to be used by the university solely for the support of education and training conducted at the university pursuant to this section. The receipt and expenditure of these funds shall be identified in the university’s biennial budget request.

History.

Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 12, §§ 1-3; W.S. 1957, 21-347 to 21-349; Laws 1975, ch. 65, § 1; ch. 107, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-109; Laws 1980, ch. 42, § 1; 1993, ch. 203, § 1; 2004, ch. 105, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, §§ 1, 2; 2016 ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (d), modifying student repayment requirements; in (e), substituted “effective July 1, 2005, and thereafter” for “heretofore,” substituted “College of Health Sciences” for “College of Human Medicine,” and added the reporting requirement; and made stylistic changes

The 2011 amendment,

repealed former (d)(iv), which read: “Upon recommendation of the president of the university, the board of trustees may relieve a student of the obligation to repay amounts expended under paragraph (i) of this subsection, in whole or in part, where repayment would cause undue hardship. The university shall annually report the number of students relieved from repayment under this paragraph to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than October 1”; and added (f).

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “or a portion of the cost of attendance” for “tuition costs” in (d)(i); in (e), inserted “other than fees and tuition payments,” in the first sentence, deleted “effective July 1, 2003, and thereafter,” following “authorized under this section” in the first sentence, substituted “University of Wyoming solely for direct assistance for relocation costs associated with practice in Wyoming, fees and materials for medical board examinations, rural training, dislocation, student development” for “University of Wyoming for assistance”, added the fifth sentence, and added “joint appropriations committee and the” in the last sentence; substituted “paragraph (d)(i) of this section” for “paragraph (i) of this subsection” in (f); and added (g).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 59, § 2 states as follows: “The authority of the University of Wyoming to expend funds from tuition and fees under
W.S.

21-17-109

and

21-17-119

as amended in section 1 of this act shall not be construed to authorize the expenditure of tuition and fees collected prior to the effective date of this act.
This section shall not affect the university's authority to expend funds from those tuitions and fees granted under any other law."

Laws 2016, ch. 59, § 3 states as follows: “For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016, funds directed to the University of Wyoming for the support of the medical and dental education programs under
W.S. 21-17-109(g) and
21-17-119(h) are appropriated to the university to be expended as authorized in this act."

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 1, appropriates $3,300 from the general fund to the University of Wyoming to fund up to an additional six first-year medical students in the WWAMI medical education program at the University of Washington for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, thereby increasing class size from ten to at least twelve and up to sixteen students. The University of Wyoming is to include in its budget request for the 2007-2008 biennium sufficient funding to sustain the size of each class at not less than twelve and not more than sixteen students. The goal is by the fall enrollment of 2007 the first year class shall have a capacity of sixteen students.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 29, 2004.

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 105, § 2, provides that the amendments to W.S.

21-17-109

(d)(ii) in section 1 of the act do not apply to students who began a family practice residency in this state before July 1, 2004. The amendments to W.S.

21-17-109

(d)(iii) in section 1 of the act are (1) to be construed to reduce interest accrued prior to July 1, 2004, which reduction shall be computed by recalculating accrued interest as if the amendments to W.S. 21-17-109(d)(iii) were in effect during the period that interest was accruing; and (2) otherwise apply beginning July 1, 2004, to students who have executed an agreement under W.S. 21-17-109.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 105, § 3, directs the University of Wyoming board of trustees to recommend alternatives in its 2005 supplemental budget for funding WWAMI payments to the University of Washington beginning July 1, 2005, to replace medical student contract repayments transferred to the medical school student fund under W.S. 21-17-109(e) as amended in section 1 of the act.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 2, directs the University of Wyoming to: (1) explore the potential of expanding the WWAMI medical education program to a total of twenty students per class; (2) explore the potential of expanding or subsidizing to a larger degree than current practice the family practice residency programs in the state, including alternative funding sources for those programs; (3) explore the potential for alternative scholarship programs for medical students from this state; and (4) report to the joint appropriations interim committee not later than December 1, 2004, results of its studies under this section, including the cost of potential changes, the number of students affected and the number of students likely to practice medicine in Wyoming as a licensed physician as a result of each specifically identified modification to a program.

§ 21-17-110.
Regional college of veterinary medicine; University of Wyoming Board of Trustees authorized to participate.

The University of Wyoming Board of Trustees may enter into agreements with the governing bodies of other universities or states for the purpose of providing for regionalized veterinary medical education and services. No final agreement is binding unless approved by the legislature.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 20, § 1.

§ 21-17-111.
Contracts to provide training in physical therapy.

The University of Wyoming may enter into contracts with institutions, universities and colleges which maintain schools for the training and education of students of physical therapy services to provide such training and education to Wyoming residents.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 46, § 1.

§ 21-17-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 228, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 132, § 1 related to rural and community health. For present similar provisions, see §

9-2-117

.

§ 21-17-113.
Agreements with universities, colleges, associations, agencies and corporations; applicability.

In addition to other powers granted to the trustees of the University of Wyoming, the trustees may enter into agreements with other institutions, universities, colleges, community colleges, boards of trustees of school districts, agencies, associations or corporations, within or without the state, providing for the offering of courses or programs of instruction, in whole or in part, at, or in cooperation with, such other institutions or agencies, or for the delivery of instruction, performance of services, or provision of materials or facilities. Such agreements may provide for the granting of University of Wyoming credit or degrees for collegiate work completed pursuant to such agreements.

Nothing in this section alters or otherwise affects any other law authorizing the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming to offer or provide any programs or courses of instruction or to enter into agreements with other institutions, universities or colleges to provide such programs or courses of instruction, nor does any other law limit or otherwise affect the board of trustees’ authority under this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 71, § 1.